test/src/morphology/N-puuoga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pūoga: # Noun 22 'eng /est poeg/fin' - full paradigm
     pūoga+N+Sg+Nom: pūoga
     pūoga+N+Sg+Gen: pūoga
     pūoga+N+Sg+Par: pȯigõ
     pūoga+N+Sg+Dat: pūogan
     pūoga+N+Sg+Ins: pūogaks
     pūoga+N+Sg+Ill: pȯigõ
     pūoga+N+Sg+Ela: pūogast
     pūoga+N+Pl+Nom: pūogad
     pūoga+N+Pl+Gen: pūogad
     pūoga+N+Pl+Par: pȯigḑi
     pūoga+N+Pl+Dat: pūogadõn
     pūoga+N+Pl+Ins: pūogadõks
     pūoga+N+Pl+Ill: pȯigži
     pūoga+N+Pl+Ela: pȯigšti
